Florida, session 2026, SB596.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSection 456.0525, Florida Statutes, is created 21 to read: 22 456.0525âDisclosure of personal benefits received from 23 pharmaceutical companies.â 24 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âpersonal benefitâ 25 means any benefit or advantage, economic or noneconomic, 26 received outside of the context of a health care practitioner 27 patient relationship. The term includes, but is not limited to, 28 investment interests, gifts, financial incentives, kickback 29 fees, speaking fees, sponsored travel, research funding, free 30 samples, and any other form of compensation. 31 (2)âTo promote transparency, accountability, and public 32 trust in health care in this state, each health care 33 practitioner shall report to the department any personal benefit 34 received from a pharmaceutical company. Reports must be updated 35 at least quarterly and include, at a minimum, details regarding 36 the nature, value, and purpose of any personal benefit received. 37 (3)âThe department shall establish uniform reporting 38 procedures and a publicly accessible online database to maintain 39 the reports. The database must allow members of the public to 40 easily search by the name of a health care practitioner or 41 pharmaceutical company and the type of personal benefit 42 received. 43 (4)âThe department shall establish guidelines for health 44 care practitioners relating to ethical practices when engaging 45 with pharmaceutical companies. 46 (5)âThe Auditor General shall perform annual audits to 47 monitor compliance with this section, verify the accuracy of 48 reported data, and address any conflicts of interest. 49 (6)âA violation of this section is grounds for disciplinary 50 action by the applicable board. A second or subsequent violation 51 of this section constitutes a misdemeanor of the first degree, 52 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 53 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.